Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.219

Obligations issued or guaranteed by African Development Bank or other multilateral development bank.

A mutual savings bank may invest not to exceed five percent of its funds in obligations issued or guaranteed by the African Development Bank or in obligations issued or guaranteed by any multilateral development bank in which the United States government formally participates.

[ 1985 c 301 s 1.]